District of Columbia statutes.
38-1802.08

Reduced fares for public transportation.

A student attending a public charter school shall be eligible for reduced fares on the Metrobus and Metrorail Transit System on the same terms and conditions as are applicable under subchapter II of Chapter 2 of Title 35, to a student attending a District of Columbia public school.

History

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [244], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2208

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2853.18.